Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB455.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established a Unit of Election Investigations and Security within the Office of the Attorney
General, which shall enforce state election laws in accordance with KRS 15.243 and:
(a) Receive complaints from election officials or any other person alleging a violation of the state
election law;
(b) Review notices and reports of an alleged violation of the state election law and conduct investigations
of any incidents that it determines require further investigation;
(c) Initiate independent inquiries or conduct preliminary investigations into any alleged violation of the
state election law in any jurisdiction of this state that it determines requires investigation;
(d) Employ investigators to conduct any investigations;
(e) Oversee the voter fraud hotline; and
(f) For purposes of investigation, have the authority to receive sworn statements and issue subpoenas to
compel the production of records and other documents.
(2) If the unit determines there may be a violation of any criminal law or state election law, it shall inform the
Attorney General or refer the findings of its investigation to the appropriate Commonwealth's or county
attorney for further investigation or prosecution.
(3) The unit shall submit a report by July 1 of each year to the Legislative Research Commission, which
provides detailed information on investigations of alleged violations of the state election laws during the
prior calendar year and includes:
(a) The total number of complaints received, independent investigations initiated, and complaints
referred to another agency for further investigation or prosecution; and
(b) For each alleged violation investigated:
1. The law allegedly violated and the nature of the violation reported;
2. The county in which the alleged violation occurred;
3. Whether the alleged violation was referred to another agency and, if so, to which agency; and
4. The current status of the investigation or resulting criminal case, unless the investigation is
open.
(4) All reports of alleged election law violations made by election officials or any other person to the Secretary
of State or the State Board of Elections shall be forwarded to the Unit of Election Investigations and
Security.
(5) This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the jurisdiction of any other office or agency of the
state empowered by law to investigate, act upon, or dispose of alleged state election law violations.
Signed by Governor March 19, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version